North Carolina, session 2025, HB256.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 12 of Chapter 95 of the General Statutes is repealed.
SECTION 2. Article 10 of Chapter 95 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 95-78.1. Public employment subject to this Article.
The provisions of this Article apply to all public employees and to all State and local
government employers in this State."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H256-v-1*